Utah statutes.
11-34-2.   Bonds issued in foreign denominations -- Required conditions and
agreements.
Any bonds issued by a public body may be denominated in a foreign currency,
but only if, at the time of the issuance of the bonds, the public body which
issues them enters into one or more foreign exchange agreements, forward
exchange agreements, foreign currency exchange agreements, or other similar
agreements with a bank or other financial institution, foreign or domestic,
the senior unsecured long-term debt obligations of which are rated in one of
the highest two rating categories by Moody's Investors Service, Inc.  or
Standard & Poor's Corporation or another similar nationally recognized
securities rating agency, to protect the public body against the risk of a
decline in the value of the United States dollar in relation to the foreign
currency in which the bonds are denominated.  Such agreements must protect
against such risk of a decline in the value of the United States dollar with
respect to the interest on the bonds and the principal of the bonds to the
maturity or redemption thereof.  The costs of such agreements, including
without limitation periodic fees and other amounts due to the other party or
parties to such agreements, may be paid by the public body from the proceeds
of the bonds and other revenues of the public body.
